Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-112.03
Division fence; changes made by Laws 2007, LB 108; applicability.

The changes made to sections 34-102, 34-112, and 37-1012 by Laws 2007, LB 108, sections 34-112.01 and 34-112.02, and the repeal of sections 34-101, 34-103 to 34-111, and 34-113 by Laws 2007, LB 108, apply commencing on March 8, 2007, except that prior law applies to any division fence dispute commenced prior to such date.

Laws 2007, LB108, § 7.